dev/postposition/postposition.ne.dix
  <!-- निर; निर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="निर__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सहित; सहित; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सहित__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बाहिर; बाहिर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बाहिर__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सिवाए; सिवाए; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सिवाए__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- तिर; तिर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="तिर__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सम्मै; सम्मै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सम्मै__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- लगायत; लगायत; 1 -->
    <pardef n="लगायत__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- विरोधी; विरोधी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="विरोधी__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जस्ती; जस्ती; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जस्ती__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जश्तो; जश्तो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जश्तो__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- निमित; निमित; 1 -->
    <pardef n="निमित__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जस्तो; जस्तो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जस्तो__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बीच; बीच; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बीच__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सितै; सितै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सितै__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पर; पर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पर__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- खातिर; खातिर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="खातिर__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- देखिन्; देखिन्; 1 -->
    <pardef n="देखिन्__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- लागि; लागि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="लागि__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अनुरूप; अनुरूप; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अनुरूप__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- देखी; देखी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="देखी__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बिहीन; बिहीन; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बिहीन__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मध्ये; मध्ये; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मध्ये__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- तिरै; तिरै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="तिरै__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अगावै; अगावै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अगावै__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- स्थित्; स्थित्; 1 -->
    <pardef n="स्थित्__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- निम्नबमोजिम; निम्नबमोजिम; 1 -->
    <pardef n="निम्नबमोजिम__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- व्दारा; व्दारा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="व्दारा__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- झै; झै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="झै__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- नुसार; नुसार; 1 -->
    <pardef n="नुसार__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- भन्दा; भन्दा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="भन्दा__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- विरूद्ध; विरूद्ध; 1 -->
    <pardef n="विरूद्ध__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- लई; लई; 1 -->
    <pardef n="लई__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बाट; बाट; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बाट__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अघि; अघि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अघि__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- वाहिर; वाहिर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="वाहिर__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- थर; थर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="थर__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सट्टा; सट्टा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सट्टा__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- उपर; उपर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="उपर__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पल्ट; पल्ट; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पल्ट__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- दायाँनिर; दायाँनिर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="दायाँनिर__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बाटै; बाटै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बाटै__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बित्तिकै; बित्तिकै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बित्तिकै__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मुनि; मुनि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मुनि__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मैं; मैं; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मैं__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कहाँ; कहाँ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="कहाँ__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- उप्रान्त; उप्रान्त; 1 -->
    <pardef n="उप्रान्त__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="निर"><i>निर</i><par n="निर__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="सहित"><i>सहित</i><par n="सहित__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="बाहिर"><i>बाहिर</i><par n="बाहिर__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="सिवाए"><i>सिवाए</i><par n="सिवाए__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="तिर"><i>तिर</i><par n="तिर__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="सम्मै"><i>सम्मै</i><par n="सम्मै__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="लगायत"><i>लगायत</i><par n="लगायत__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="विरोधी"><i>विरोधी</i><par n="विरोधी__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="जस्ती"><i>जस्ती</i><par n="जस्ती__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="जश्तो"><i>जश्तो</i><par n="जश्तो__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="निमित"><i>निमित</i><par n="निमित__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="जस्तो"><i>जस्तो</i><par n="जस्तो__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="बीच"><i>बीच</i><par n="बीच__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="सितै"><i>सितै</i><par n="सितै__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="पर"><i>पर</i><par n="पर__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="खातिर"><i>खातिर</i><par n="खातिर__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="देखिन्"><i>देखिन्</i><par n="देखिन्__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="लागि"><i>लागि</i><par n="लागि__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="अनुरूप"><i>अनुरूप</i><par n="अनुरूप__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="देखी"><i>देखी</i><par n="देखी__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="बिहीन"><i>बिहीन</i><par n="बिहीन__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="मध्ये"><i>मध्ये</i><par n="मध्ये__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="तिरै"><i>तिरै</i><par n="तिरै__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="अगावै"><i>अगावै</i><par n="अगावै__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="स्थित्"><i>स्थित्</i><par n="स्थित्__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="निम्नबमोजिम"><i>निम्नबमोजिम</i><par n="निम्नबमोजिम__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="व्दारा"><i>व्दारा</i><par n="व्दारा__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="झै"><i>झै</i><par n="झै__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="नुसार"><i>नुसार</i><par n="नुसार__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="भन्दा"><i>भन्दा</i><par n="भन्दा__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="विरूद्ध"><i>विरूद्ध</i><par n="विरूद्ध__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="लई"><i>लई</i><par n="लई__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="बाट"><i>बाट</i><par n="बाट__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="अघि"><i>अघि</i><par n="अघि__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="वाहिर"><i>वाहिर</i><par n="वाहिर__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="थर"><i>थर</i><par n="थर__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="सट्टा"><i>सट्टा</i><par n="सट्टा__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="उपर"><i>उपर</i><par n="उपर__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="पल्ट"><i>पल्ट</i><par n="पल्ट__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="दायाँनिर"><i>दायाँनिर</i><par n="दायाँनिर__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="बाटै"><i>बाटै</i><par n="बाटै__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="बित्तिकै"><i>बित्तिकै</i><par n="बित्तिकै__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="मुनि"><i>मुनि</i><par n="मुनि__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="मैं"><i>मैं</i><par n="मैं__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="कहाँ"><i>कहाँ</i><par n="कहाँ__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="उप्रान्त"><i>उप्रान्त</i><par n="उप्रान्त__pst"/></e>
